bng.dix
		<e lm="BAwa"><i>BAw</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pawra"><i>pawr</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="uxbega"><i>uxbeg</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pakRI"><i>pakRI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="pakRiSAlA"><i>pakRiSAlA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="baswu"><i>baswu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="ciwAbAGa"><i>ciwAbAG</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="cumbana"><i>cumban</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="cora"><i>cor</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="praharI"><i>praharI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="pipIlikA"><i>pipIlikA</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="buka"><i>buka</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="Cuti"><i>Cuti</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="CAwra"><i>CAwr</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bana"><i>ban</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>				
		<e lm="araNya"><i>araNy</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="sWAna"><i>sWAn</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>			
		<e lm="aparihAryawA"><i>aparihAryawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>				
		<e lm="biRa"><i>biRa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="jAhAja"><i>jAhAja</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="jAxu"><i>jAxu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="jAxukara"><i>jAxukar</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="naraka"><i>narak</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="jIbana"><i>jIban</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="jFAna"><i>jFAn</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="janwu"><i>janwu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="julAi"><i>julAi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="juwo"><i>juwo</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pawAkA"><i>pawAkA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="yuxXa"><i>yuxX</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="hraxa"><i>hrax</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="miWyA"><i>miWyA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="tameto"><i>tameto</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="tukarA"><i>tukarA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="tupi"><i>tupi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="TelA gAdZi"><i>TelA<b/>gAdZi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="paxasKalana"><i>paxasKalana</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="lATi"><i>lATi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="XAwAna"><i>XAwAna</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="Dola"><i>Dol</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>						
                <e lm="pukura"><i>pukur</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="sbAsWya"><i>sbAsWy</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bewana"><i>bewan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="XbaMsa"><i>XbaMs</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="unnawi"><i>unnawi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>			
		<e lm="sAnwbanA"><i>sAnwbanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="Cabi"><i>Cabi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>				
		<e lm="wAriKa"><i>wAriK</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="wiWi"><i>wiWi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="praSaMsA"><i>praSaMsA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="prajApawi"><i>prajApawi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="JadZa"><i>JadZ</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>				
		<e lm="wowApAKi"><i>wowApAKi</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="upahAra"><i>upahAr</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="klAnwi"><i>klAnwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="biRAxa"><i>biRAx</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xarajA"><i>xarajA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="TAkuraxAxA"><i>TAkuraxAxA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="sbAkRara"><i>sbAkRar</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xAzwa"><i>xAzwa</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="TAkuramA"><i>TAkuramA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xixi"><i>xixi</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="birakwi"><i>birakwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xina"><i>xin</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xioyZAli"><i>xioyZAli</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xokAna"><i>xokAn</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xupura"><i>xupur</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="nababaXU"><i>nababaXU</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bara"><i>bar</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="Sawru"><i>Sawru</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="xuXa"><i>xuX</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="xUrawba"><i>xUrawba</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="xeSa"><i>xeS</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="banXu"><i>banXu</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="banXuwba"><i>banXuwb</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="sampaxa"><i>sampax</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Xarma"><i>Xarm</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="XUlikaNA"><i>XUlikaNA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="ekAgrawA"><i>ekAgrawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="pqWibI"><i>pqWibI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="suwA"><i>suwA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="XanyabAxa"><i>XanyabAxa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="naxI"><i>naxI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="cAkari"><i>cAkari</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="labaNa"><i>labaN</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="nakala"><i>nakal</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="nAka"><i>nAk</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="nAma"><i>nAm</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="nArakela"><i>nArakel</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="newA"><i>newA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="niyZama"><i>niyZam</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Sahara"><i>Sahar</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="swrI"><i>swrI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="jIba"><i>jIb</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="paricayZa"><i>paricayZa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="jIbana"><i>jIban</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="parIkRA"><i>parIkRA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="parIkRaka"><i>parIkRaka</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="pqWibI"><i>pqWibI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="praBAba"><i>praBAb</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="TikAnA"><i>TikAnA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="pAwA"><i>pAwA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="pqRTA"><i>pqRTA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="paraSu"><i>paraSu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="parI"><i>parI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="pA"><i>pA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="jala"><i>jal</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="gACa"><i>gAC</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="tAkA"><i>tAkA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="nAwi"><i>nAwi</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="nAwinI"><i>nAwinI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="prema"><i>prema</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="wqRNA"><i>wqRNA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Pula"><i>Pul</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Pala"><i>Pal</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="subiXA"><i>subiXA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="baCara"><i>baCar</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="kaWA"><i>kaWA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="bAxAma"><i>bAxAm</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="piwA"><i>piwA</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="bqRti"><i>bqRti</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="cula"><i>cul</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Cele-meyZe"><i>Cele-meyZe</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="biCAnA"><i>biCAnA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="budZA"><i>budZA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="budZI"><i>budZI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Cele"><i>Cele</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kanyA"><i>kanyA</i><par n="aXyApikA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="BayZa"><i>BayZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="BAi"><i>BAi</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="xAxA"><i>xAxA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="BAgya"><i>BAgy</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kRuXA"><i>kRuXA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mana"><i>man</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="samrAta"><i>samrAta</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="muKa"><i>muK</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAnabawA"><i>mAnabawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mACa"><i>mAC</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sAhAyya"><i>sAhAyy</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAsa"><i>mAs</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mA"><i>mA</i><par n="aXyApikA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAGa"><i>mAG</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kRamA"><i>kRamA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAmA"><i>mAmA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAsI"><i>mAsI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAti"><i>mAti</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="awiWi"><i>awiWi</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="yuxXa"><i>yuxX</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rafa"><i>rafa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rakRA"><i>rakRA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAwa"><i>rAw</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAswA"><i>rAswA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="paWa"><i>paW</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Cele"><i>Cele</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="meyZe"><i>meyZe</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="loBa"><i>loB</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="byabasAyZa"><i>byabasAyZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="byabahAra"><i>byabahAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="biSbAsa"><i>biSbAsa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bixyAlayZa"><i>bixyAlayZ</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="lajjA"><i>lajjA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Sahara"><i>Sahar</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sanXyA"><i>sanXyA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bAGa"><i>bAG</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="siMha"><i>siMh</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="samayZa"><i>samayZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sbapna"><i>sbapn</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="praSna"><i>praSn</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="banXu"><i>banXu</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sakAla"><i>sakAl</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Apela"><i>Apel</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="SbAsa"><i>SbAs</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="praSbAsa"><i>praSbAs</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="SbAsa-praSbAsa"><i>SbAsa-praSbAs</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sAhasa"><i>sAhas</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bAwAsa"><i>bAwAs</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hqxayZa"><i>hqxayZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hAsi"><i>hAsi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sapwAha"><i>sapwAh</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hAwa"><i>hAwa</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hAwi"><i>hAwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hinxu"><i>hinxu</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="haswaSilpa"><i>haswaSilpa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bAsa"><i>bAs</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="paryatana"><i>paryatan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mAnaciwra"><i>mAnaciwr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pUrba"><i>pUrb</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="BArawIyZa"><i>BArawIyZ</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="SawAbxI"><i>SawAbxI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bi.si."><i>bi.<b/>si.</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hisAba"><i>hisAb</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kellA"><i>kellA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="SAsaka"><i>SAsak</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Ara esa ti si"><i>Ara<b/>esa<b/>ti<b/>si</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="paryAyZa"><i>paryAyZa</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="attAlikA"><i>attAlikA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="muGala"><i>muGal</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ArkitekacAra"><i>ArkitekacA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sWapawi"><i>sWapawi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sarakArI"><i>sarakArI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="yAxuGara"><i>yAxuGar</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="janasAXAraNa"><i>janasAXAraN</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kATera baswu"><i>kATera<b/>baswu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pAWara"><i>pAWar</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="KqRtAbxa"><i>KqRtAbx</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ASrayZasWala"><i>ASrayZasWal</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="biSba"><i>biSb</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="awIwa"><i>awIw</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="garimA"><i>garimA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AiBari"><i>AiBari</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="paryataka"><i>paryataka</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="SutiM"><i>SutiM</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="xala"><i>xal</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="grIRma"><i>grIRm</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
